District of Columbia statutes.
46-305.01

Employer’s receipt of income-withholding order of another state.

An income-withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under Chapter 2 of this title, without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of the District.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 501, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(e)(1), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-345.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 substituted “sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person” for “sent to the person or entity”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(i) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of subchapter, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of subchapter heading, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 501 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).